Washington statutes.
RCW 9.47.090

Maintaining bucket shop—Penalty.

Every person, whether in his or her own behalf, or as agent, servant or employee of another person, within or outside of this state, who shall open, conduct or carry on any bucket shop, or make or offer to make any contract described in RCW 9.47.080, or with intent to make such a contract, or assist therein, shall receive, exhibit, or display any statement of market prices of any commodities, securities, or property, is guilty of a class C felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five years.

[ 2003 c 53 s 36; 1992 c 7 s 13; 1909 c 249 s 224; RRS s 2476.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.